Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-362.01
Indian reservation; county share of funds.

Each qualifying county in which an Indian reservation is located shall receive an equal share of the funds paid out in accordance with section 23-362 for each reservation within the county.

Laws 1976, LB 871, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 5, § 3.